Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.190.120

Institutional education programs—School district board of directors.

The office of the superintendent of public instruction must provide a copy of the disaggregated data provided under RCW 28A.190.110(1) to the board of directors of each school district that provides education services to youth and postresident youth for the purpose of giving the board the opportunity to:

(1) Review the performance of the institutional education provider; and

(2) Make changes to annual school improvement plans required by WAC 180-16-220, or other policies and procedures as necessary to improve youth and postresident youth outcomes.

[ 2021 c 164 s 13.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2021 c 164: See note following RCW 28A.190.005.